de: Lackierung: Glänzend; Matt; Metallisch; Handnähmaschine; Seidenmatt; Sonstiges
fr: Finition de peinture: Brillant; Mat; Métallique; Perle; Satiné; Autre
en: Paint finish: Gloss; Matte; Metallic; Pearl; Satin; Other
zh-TW: 漆面: 亮彩唇蜜; 霧面; 金屬色; 珍珠; 緞面布; 其他
hu: Festékbevonat: Fényes; Matt; Fémes; Gyöngy; Szatén; Egyéb
pl: Wykończenie farby: Połysk; Matowy; Metaliczny; Perła; Satyna; Inne
sv: Färgfinish: Glans; Matt; Metallisk; Pärla; Satin; Övrigt
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava lakom: Lesk; Matný; Kovový; Perla; Satén; Iné
el: Φινίρισμα βαφής: Λάμψη; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Πέρλα; Σατέν; Άλλο
da: Malingsfinish: Glans; Mat; Metallisk; Perle; Satin; Andet
hr-HR: Izgled boje: Sjaj; Mat; Metalik; Sedefasti; Saten; Ostalo
ja: 塗料の仕上げ具合: グロス; マット; メタリック; パール; サテン; その他
nl: Verfafwerking: Glans; Mat; Metallic; Parel; Satijn; Andere
ko: 페인트 마감: 글로스; 매트; 메탈릭; 펄; 새틴; 기타
th: การเคลือบสี: วาว; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก; ไข่มุก; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Zaključna barva: Sijaj; Mat; Kovinski; Biserni; Satenast; Drugo
pt-BR: Acabamento de pintura: Gloss; Fosco; Metálico; Pérola; Cetim; Outro
fi: Maaliviimeistely: Kiiltävä; Matta; Metallinen; Helmeilevä; Satiini; Muu
it: Finitura della pittura: Lucido; Matte; Metallico; Perlato; Satinato; Altro
ru: Красочное покрытие: Глянцевый; Матовый; Металлик; Перламутровый; Полуматовый; Другой
nb: Malingsfinish: Gloss; Matt; Metallisk; Perle; Sateng; Annet
vi: Độ hoàn thiện lớp sơn: Bóng; Lì; Ánh kim; Chân may đính ngọc; Satin; Khác
tr: Boya kaplama: Parlak; Mat; Metalik; İnci; Saten; Diğer
lt-LT: Dažų užbaigimas: Blizgūs; Matiniai; Metalo žvilgesio; Perliniai; Satino žvilgesio; Kita
pt-PT: Acabamento para pintura: Brilhante; Mate; Metálico; Pérola; Acetinado; Outro
cs: Povrchová úprava lakem: Lesk; Matná; Metalický; Perleť; Satén; Jiné
bg-BG: Покритие на боята: Гланц; Мат; Металик; Перла; Сатен; Други
es: Acabado de pintura: Brillo; Mate; Metálico; Cordoncillo; Satinado; Otros
zh-CN: 漆面: 亮光; 哑光; 金属色; 珍珠; 缎; 其他
ro-RO: Finisaj vopsea: Lucioasă; Mată; Metalizată; Sidefată; Satinată; Altele